Hawaii statutes.
§712-1270.5 Injunctions against
persons. Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit injunctions
against persons causing, maintaining, aiding, abetting, or permitting a
nuisance from entering or residing in any public or private building, premises,
or place, in or upon which the nuisance exists. [L 1998, c 286, §1; am L 2005,
c 123, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next